Utah statutes.
58-24b-402.   Patient care and management.

(1)  In practicing physical therapy, a licensed physical therapist shall:

(a)  manage all aspects of the physical therapy of a patient under the licensed physical therapist's care;

(b)  perform the initial evaluation and documentation for each patient;

(c)  perform periodic reevaluation and documentation for each patient;

(d)  perform physical therapy interventions that require immediate and continuous examination and evaluation throughout the intervention;

(e)  perform all therapeutic intervention on a patient that is outside of the standard scope of practice of a licensed physical therapist assistant or a physical therapy aide;

(f)  determine the therapeutic intervention to be performed by a licensed physical therapist assistant under the on-site supervision or general supervision of the licensed physical therapist to ensure that the therapeutic intervention is safe, effective, efficient, and within the scope of practice of the licensed physical therapist assistant;

(g)  conduct the discharge of each patient and document for each patient, at the time of discharge, the patient's response to therapeutic intervention; and

(h)  provide accurate documentation of the billing and services provided.

(2)  A physical therapist assistant or a physical therapy aide may not:

(a)  perform a physical therapy evaluation or assessment;

(b)  identify or label a physical impairment or injury;

(c)  design a plan of care for a patient;

(d)  perform the joint mobilization component of manual therapy; or

(e)  perform the sharp selective debridement component of wound management.

(3)  Subsection (2)(d) does not apply to:

(a)  simple joint distraction techniques or stretching; or

(b)  a stretch or mobilization that can be given as part of a home exercise program.

